Mississippi, session 2026, SB2484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Building Regional Infrastructure for Diverse Growth in Education (BRIDGE) Act." SECTION 2.  (1)  The Legislature finds that Mississippi's public education system must respond to diverse and evolving student needs through regional collaboration, innovation, and strategic partnerships. (2)  The Legislature further finds that: (a)  Students with disabilities, learning differences, and specialized instructional needs require evidence-based educational models delivered at sufficient scale; and (b)  Students pursuing workforce pathways require expanded access to high-quality, regionally aligned career and technical education and training opportunities. (3)  It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a cohesive statutory framework under which the State Department of Education may develop regional, replicable special-purpose school models, while maintaining distinct policy tracks tailored to different student populations and workforce needs. SECTION 3.  As used in this article: (a) "Department" means the State Department of Education. (b)  "Local education agency" or "LEA" means a school district or other public entity authorized to operate schools in Mississippi. (c)  "Special-needs students" include students diagnosed with dyslexia, autism spectrum disorder, students with Individualized Education Programs (IEPs), students with plans under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 and related services, or students requiring specialized instructional supports or related services. (d)  "Special-purpose school" means a public school or public program designed to deliver specialized instruction, intervention, related services, and workforce training to students with special needs. SECTION 4. (1)  The Legislature finds that school districts across Mississippi face persistent shortages of qualified special-education teachers, credentialed dyslexia therapists, certified behavioral specialists, and related service providers, particularly in rural and underserved areas, which limits the ability of local education agencies to fully meet student needs and comply with state and federal requirements. (2)  The purpose of this article is to establish a statewide framework for the development of regional special-purpose schools serving students with special needs, including students with dyslexia, autism spectrum disorder, Individualized Education Programs (IEPs), and Section 504 plans. SECTION 5. (1)  The department shall conduct a statewide study and planning process for the development of regional special-purpose schools serving students with special needs. (2)  The study shall be statewide in scope and shall not be limited to any single geographic region. (3)  The department shall evaluate models under which regional special-purpose schools may: (a)  Operate as standalone public schools; (b)  Operate in partnership with one or more local education agencies; (c)  Operate in collaboration with public universities, community colleges, or other public postsecondary institutions; (d)  Operate as a public charter school, consistent with Mississippi law; or (e)  Operate in collaboration with any combination of the models described in this subsection (3). SECTION 6. (1)  Not later than October 1, 2026, the department shall submit a written report to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Education Committees. (2)  The report shall include: (a)  An assessment of regional and statewide need; (b)  Identification of LEAs willing to partner; (c)  Identification of universities and community colleges willing to partner; (d)  Recommended governance and accountability structures; (e)  Staffing needs, including credentialed dyslexia therapists and certified behavioral specialists; (f)  Workforce pipeline and training opportunities; (g)  Estimated costs and funding sources; and (h)  A phased pilot implementation plan. SECTION 7. The department may recommend one or more pilot regional special-purpose schools serving students with special needs, giving special consideration to locations in counties in which there is no municipality with a population exceeding fifteen thousand (15,000) persons according to the latest federal decennial census. SECTION 8. Programs under this article shall align with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, and state dyslexia laws and regulations. SECTION 9. The purpose of this article is to establish a statewide framework for the development of regional special-purpose schools focused on career and technical education and workforce training. SECTION 10. As used in this article: (a)  "Accelerate Mississippi" means the state workforce development entity charged with coordinating statewide workforce strategy. (b) "Department" means the State Department of Education. (c)  "Career and technical education" or "CTE" means organized programs providing academic knowledge, technical skills, employability skills, and industry-recognized credentials. (d)  "Local education agency" or "LEA" means a school district or other public entity authorized to operate schools in Mississippi. (e)  "Special-purpose school" means a public school or public program designed to deliver career and technical education, workforce training, industry-aligned instruction, and credential pathways. SECTION 11. (1)  The department shall conduct a statewide study and planning process for regional CTE special-purpose schools. (2)  The department shall coordinate with Accelerate Mississippi, the Mississippi Community College Board, and other relevant agencies. (3)  The department shall evaluate operational models, including LEAs, charters, postsecondary institutions, employers, and hybrid partnerships. (4)  Not later than January 1, 2027, the department shall publish a district guide on expanding regional CTE partnerships. SECTION 12. (1)  Not later than October 1, 2026, the department shall submit a report to the House and Senate Education and Workforce Development Committees. (2)  The report shall include: (a)  Workforce demand analysis informed by Accelerate Mississippi; (b)  Partnering districts and institutions; (c)  Employer participation; (d)  Governance and performance metrics; (e)  Staffing needs; (f)  Cost estimates and funding sources; (g)  Perkins V alignment; and (h)  Pilot recommendations. SECTION 13. The department may recommend one or more pilot regional CTE special-purpose schools, prioritized by workforce demand, and giving special consideration to locations in counties in which there is no municipality with a population exceeding fifteen thousand (15,000) persons according to the latest federal decennial census. SECTION 14. Programs under this article shall align with the Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act (Perkins V) and existing state workforce strategies. SECTION 15.  Sections 3 through 14 of this act shall be codified in a new chapter in Title 37, Mississippi Code of 1972.  Sections 3 through 8 of this act shall be codified as a separate article in the new chapter.  Sections 9 through 14 of this act shall be codified as a separate article in the new chapter. SECTION 16.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.